Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.072

Examinations.

(1) Examination of applicants shall be held in Olympia, Washington, or at such other place as designated by the secretary, at least annually at such times as the board may determine.

(2) Any applicant who fails to make a passing grade on the examination may be allowed to retake the examination. Any applicant who fails the examination a second time must obtain special permission from the board to take the examination again.

(3) The board may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing authorities.

[ 2004 c 262 s 10; 1996 c 191 s 65; 1995 c 198 s 12; 1991 c 3 s 198; 1984 c 279 s 81; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 15; 1965 c 70 s 20.]

NOTES:

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.